Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 3. Additional State Retirement and Disability Benefits.
§ 25-11-133.
Guaranty; vested right to benefits; maximum annual retirement allowance.

The maintenance of actuarial reserves for the various allowances and benefits under Articles 1 and 3, and the payment of all annuities, retirement allowances, refunds and other benefits granted hereunder are made obligations of the employer’s accumulation accounts. All income, interest and dividends derived from deposits and investments authorized by those articles shall be used for the payment of the obligations of the system.

In the event of the termination of the Public Employees’ Retirement System established pursuant to the provisions of Section 25-11-101 et seq., all members of the system as of the date of termination of the system shall be deemed to have a vested right to benefits to the extent and in the same manner that rights would be vested under the statute existing as of the date of termination of the system, except that any member who, because of a termination of the system has not fulfilled the requirements for length of service, shall nonetheless be entitled to compensation as of the date that such member would otherwise be eligible, with such compensation to be computed on the basis of time actually a member of the service and compensation actually earned during the time a member, in the manner now provided by statute.

In the event of a deficit in the availability of funds for payment due under the provisions of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, an appropriation shall be made sufficient for the payment thereof as an obligation of the state.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section or this title to the contrary, the maximum annual retirement allowance attributable to the employer contributions payable by the system to a member shall be subject to the limitations set forth in Section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code and any regulations issued thereunder as applicable to governmental plans as the term is defined under Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The board is authorized to provide by rule or regulation for the payment of benefits as provided under this chapter to members or beneficiaries of the retirement system at a time and under circumstances not otherwise provided for in this chapter to the extent that the payment is required to maintain the system as a qualified retirement plan for purposes of federal income tax laws.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this plan, all distributions from this plan shall conform to the regulations issued under Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, applicable to governmental plans, as defined in Section 414(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, including the incidental death benefit provisions of Section 401(a)(9)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code. Further, the regulations shall override any plan provision that is inconsistent with Section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code.

The actuarial assumptions used to convert a retirement allowance from the normal form of payment to an optional form of payment shall be an appendix to Article 3 and subject to approval by the board based upon certification by the actuary.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this plan, the maximum compensation that can be considered for all plan purposes shall not be greater than that allowed under Section 401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-26; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 26; Laws, 1979, ch. 414; Laws, 1992, ch. 576 § 8; Laws, 1995, ch. 624, § 9; Laws, 2001, ch. 438, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 627, § 14; Laws, 2007, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 25-11-135.
Former laws remain in force.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed as repealing any existing law of this state providing for the retirement of teachers, firemen, policemen, or any other public employees.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-28; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 28, eff January 1, 1953.

§ 25-11-137.
Transfer of law enforcement officers’ or firemen’s funds.

Any law enforcement officer or fireman who has been covered under this article or under Section 21-29-101 et seq., Section 21-29-201 et seq., or Section 25-13-1 et seq., and who changes his employment from one jurisdiction to another jurisdiction, or has previously made that change, may elect to transfer retirement service credit earned while covered under the retirement system of the former jurisdiction to that of the latter as provided in this section.

Any law enforcement officer or fireman transferring as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection and having paid retirement funds under this article or under Section 21-29-101 et seq., Section 21-29-201 et seq., or Section 25-13-1 et seq., must pay into the retirement system to which he is transferring the full amount of employee contributions that he would have paid into that system if he had been a member of that system for each year of creditable service that is being transferred, together with regular interest that would have been earned by that system on those contributions, and he must also pay, or the system from which he is transferring must pay, into the system to which he is being transferred, an amount equal to that which the employer would have paid if he had been a member of that system for each year transferred, together with regular interest that would have been earned by that system on those contributions. The retirement system from which he is being transferred shall be required to pay into the system to which he is transferring any funds credited to his account. Any additional funds that may be required shall be paid by the person being transferred. Those payments may be made in quarterly increments. Failure to make these proper adjustment payments will void any transfer of service credits.

The benefits that are being currently paid by the system in which the law enforcement officer or fireman has last been a member, and the requirements for retirement or disability benefits, shall be those applicable to the officer falling under the provisions of this section. Any law enforcement officer or fireman who elects to transfer retirement service credit may immediately transfer the funds and service as provided for in subsection (1) of this section; however, the amounts that are transferred by the law enforcement officer or fireman and his employer, if applicable, and the service credit related to the transfer of funds, shall not be used in any benefit calculation or determination of eligibility for benefits until the person has remained a contributing member of the retirement system to which he is transferring for the minimum period necessary to qualify for a monthly retirement allowance or benefit. Upon the complete transfer and payment of that credit, all time spent in the covered law enforcement or fire department service, as noted above, within and for the State of Mississippi or the political subdivisions thereof, shall apply to the time required by law necessary to effect the retirement or disability of the officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-41; Laws, 1968, ch. 576, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 398; Laws, 1999, ch. 544, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 25-11-139.
Payment, commencement of benefits.

Any retirement allowance or other annuity or benefit provided by Articles 1 and 3 shall be paid in equal monthly installments for life and shall not be increased, decreased, revoked or repealed, except for error upon detection, regardless of the length of time between the reporting error or the time payment started and the time the board became aware of the error, or except where specifically otherwise provided by said articles. This responsibility is, and has been, the duty of the board since the creation of the retirement system.

Pursuant to Section 25-11-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, it is and has been the sole responsibility of the member or beneficiary thereof to apply for benefits and no benefits shall be paid for any period prior to the first of the month following the receipt of such application for such benefits, but in no event prior to termination of employment, except as authorized in Section 25-11-114.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7446-26; Laws, 1952, ch. 299, § 26; Laws, 1994, ch. 601, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 628, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 25-11-141.
Group life and health benefits for retired persons.

The board of trustees may enter into an agreement with insurance companies, hospital service associations, medical or health care corporations, health maintenance organizations, or government agencies authorized to do business in the state for issuance of a policy or contract of life, health, medical, hospital or surgical benefits, or any combination thereof, for those persons receiving a service, disability or survivor retirement allowance from any system administered by the board. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the policy or contract also may include coverage for the spouse and dependent children of such eligible person and for such sponsored dependents as the board considers appropriate. If all or any portion of the policy or contract premium is to be paid by any person receiving a service, disability or survivor retirement allowance, such person shall, by written authorization, instruct the board to deduct from the retirement allowance the premium cost and to make payments to such companies, associations, corporations or agencies.

The board may contract for such coverage on the basis that the cost of the premium for the coverage will be paid by the person receiving a retirement allowance.

The board is authorized to accept bids for such optional coverage and benefits and to make all necessary rules pursuant to the purpose and intent of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 385; Laws, 2002, ch. 636, § 10; Laws, 2016, ch. 397, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§§ 25-11-143 and 25-11-145.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2016, ch. 397, § 24, effective July 1, 2016.

§25-11-143. [Laws, 2002, ch. 636, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.]

§25-11-145. [Laws, 2002, ch. 636, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 474, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2006.]